Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 8, chapter 672, Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by  section 2, chapter 169,
Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  (1) Section 7, chapter 672,  Oregon Laws 2013, as amended by section 1, chapter 169,
Oregon Laws 2021, is repealed on January 2, [ 2026] 2032.
(2) The Columbia River Fisheries Enhancement Fund established  under section 7, chapter 672,
Oregon Laws 2013, is abolished January 2, [ 2026] 2032.
(3) Any unexpended moneys  remaining in the Columbia River Fisheries Enhancement Fund on
January 2, [ 2026] 2032, shall be transferred to the State Wildlife Fund.
SECTION 2.  Section 6, chapter 169, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  The amendments to ORS 496.146 by section 5  [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 169, Oregon
Laws 2021, become operative on January 2, [ 2026] 2032.
SECTION 3.  Section 8, chapter 169, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 8.  Section  22, chapter 779, Oregon Laws 2015,  as amended by section 7, chapter 169,
Oregon Laws 2021, is repealed on January 2, [ 2026] 2032.
Enrolled House Bill 2343 (HB 2343-A) Page 1
Passed by House February 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2343 (HB 2343-A) Page 2